Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1710
Delivery and issuance of policy; requirements.

All policies of credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state only by an insurer authorized to do an insurance business therein, and shall be issued only through holders of licenses granted by the director.

Laws 1959, c. 214, § 10, p. 742.